Utah statutes.
9-1-805.   Election of officers.
The officers of the commission shall be chair, vice chair, secretary, and
treasurer.  All officers shall be elected by the voting commission members
from among the members of the commission and shall serve for a term of one
year.  Vacancies in any office shall be filled with an election by the
commission for the remainder of the unexpired term.
